Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB471.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8704. Citizenship status of criminal defendants.An attorney for the Commonwealth shall notify United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement if, at any point during the course of a criminal proceeding, the attorney for the Commonwealth obtains information reasonably indicating that a criminal defendant is not a citizen of the United States or otherwise has been present in this Commonwealth or the United States in violation of 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718